Nebraska, session 109, LB183.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 69-1311, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
69-1311 (a) The Between March 1 and March 10 of each year the State
Treasurer shall annually cause notice to be published once in an English
language legal newspaper of general circulation in each the county in this
state in which is located the last-known address of any person to be named in
the notice. If no address is known, then the notice shall be published in a
legal newspaper having statewide circulation.
(b) The published notice shall be entitled Notice to Owners of Abandoned
Property , and shall contain:
(1) The names in alphabetical order and counties of last-known addresses,
if any, of persons listed in the report and entitled to notice as provided in
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A statement that information concerning the amount or description of
the property and the name and address of the holder may be obtained by any
person possessing an interest in the property by addressing an inquiry to the
State Treasurer.
(c) The State Treasurer is not required to publish in such notice any item
of less than fifty dollars unless he or she deems such publication to be in the
public interest.
(d) Within one hundred twenty days from the receipt of the report required
by section 69-1310, the State Treasurer shall mail a notice to each person
having an address listed therein who appears to be entitled to property of the
value of fifty dollars or more presumed abandoned under the Uniform Disposition
of Unclaimed Property Act.
(e) The mailed notice shall contain:
(1) A statement that, according to a report filed with the State
Treasurer, property is being held to which the addressee appears entitled.
(2) The name and address of the person holding the property and any
necessary information regarding changes of name and address of the holder.
(3) A statement that, if satisfactory proof of claim is presented by the
owner to the State Treasurer, arrangements will be made to transfer the
property to the owner as provided by law.
(f) This section is not applicable to sums payable on traveler's checks or
money orders presumed abandoned under section 69-1302.
Sec. 2. Section 69-1317, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
69-1317 (a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, all funds
received under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, including the
proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under section 69-1316, shall be
deposited by the State Treasurer into the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund from
which he or she shall make prompt payment of claims allowed pursuant to the act
and payment of any expenses related to unclaimed property. All funds received
under section 69-1307.05 shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt payment of
claims regarding such funds allowed pursuant to the act. Transfers from the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction
of the Legislature. Before making the deposit he or she shall record the name
and last-known address of each person appearing from the holders' reports to be
entitled to the abandoned property, the name and last-known address of each
insured person or annuitant, and with respect to each policy or contract listed
in the report of a life insurance corporation, its number, the name of the
corporation, and the amount due. The record shall be available for public
inspection during business hours. The separate life insurance corporation
demutualization trust fund terminates on March 13, 2019, and the State
Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund.
The record shall not be subject to public inspection or available for
copying, reproduction, or scrutiny by commercial or professional locators of
property presumed abandoned who charge any service. A or finders' fee cannot be
charged by commercial or professional locators of property presumed abandoned
until twenty-four months after the names from the holders' reports have been
published or officially disclosed. Records concerning the social security
number, date of birth, and last-known address of an owner shall be treated as
confidential and subject to the same confidentiality as tax return information
held by the Department of Revenue, except that the Auditor of Public Accounts
shall have unrestricted access to such records.
-1-

LB183 LB183
2025 2025
A professional finders' fee shall be limited to ten percent of the total
dollar amount of the property presumed abandoned. To claim any such fee, the
finder shall disclose to the owner the nature, location, and value of the
property, provide notice of when such property was reported to the State
Treasurer, and provide notice that the property may be claimed by the owner
from the State Treasurer free of charge. To claim any such fee if the property
has not yet been abandoned, the finder shall disclose to the owner the nature,
location, and value of the property, provide notice of when such property will
be reported to the State Treasurer, if known, and provide notice that, upon
receipt of the property by the State Treasurer, such property may be claimed by
the owner from the State Treasurer free of charge.
(2) The unclaimed property records of the State Treasurer, the unclaimed
property reports of holders, and the information derived by an unclaimed
property examination or audit of the records of a person or otherwise obtained
by or communicated to the State Treasurer may be withheld from the public. Any
record or information that may be withheld under the laws of this state or of
the United States when in the possession of such a person may be withheld when
revealed or delivered to the State Treasurer. Any record or information that is
withheld under any law of another state when in the possession of that other
state may be withheld when revealed or delivered by the other state to the
State Treasurer.
Information withheld from the general public concerning any aspect of
unclaimed property shall only be disclosed to an apparent owner of the property
or to the escheat, unclaimed, or abandoned property administrators or officials
of another state if that other state accords substantially reciprocal
privileges to the State Treasurer.
(b) On or before November 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall
distribute any balance in excess of one million dollars from the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund to the permanent school fund.
(c) Before making any deposit to the credit of the permanent school fund
or the General Fund, the State Treasurer may deduct any costs related to
unclaimed property and place such funds in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund
which is hereby created. Transfers from the fund to the General Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Unclaimed Property
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Original sections 69-1311 and 69-1317, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-2-